apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
    <pardef n="makkir__Pron_Rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ada</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adak</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagá</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagi</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adaga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adakga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagága</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagiga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adage</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adak</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adakge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagáge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagák</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagige</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagik</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adakgen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagágen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adagigen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Abe"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jn</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jnga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jnge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jngen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isgen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ela"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ij</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijgen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ingen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ine"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>age</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>av</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avga</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avge</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>avgen</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijda</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijdak</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijdagá</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijdagi</l>
          <r><s n="Pron"/><s n="Rel"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Abe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ijdaga</l>

    <e lm="makkár"><i>makkár</i><par n="makkir__Pron_Rel"/></e>
    <e lm="makkir"><i>makkir</i><par n="makkir__Pron_Rel"/></e>
